Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.60.050

Limitation on actions. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

Except as provided in RCW 29B.60.060(4), any action brought under the provisions of this title must be commenced within five years after the date when the violation occurred.

[ 2024 c 164 s 494; 2018 c 304 s 15; 2011 c 60 s 26; 2007 c 455 s 2; 1982 c 147 s 18; 1973 c 1 s 41 (Initiative Measure No. 276, approved November 7, 1972). Formerly RCW 42.17A.770, 42.17.410.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Effective date—2011 c 60: See note following RCW 29B.20.030.

Finding—Intent—2018 c 304: See note following RCW 29B.25.090.

Effective date—Construction—1973 c 1: See notes following RCW 29B.05.010.